Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB516.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 52CSUBSTANCE USE OVERDOSE AWARENESS, TREATMENT AND RECOVERY SUPPORTSubchapterA. Preliminary ProvisionsB. Opioid Overdose AwarenessC. Lifetime Recovery from Substance Use Grant Program SUBCHAPTER APRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSec.1234567891011121314151617181920 52C01. Scope of chapter.52C02. Definitions.§ 52C01. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to substance use and misuse treatment and support services.§ 52C02. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Alcohol." The term includes "malt or brewed beverages" and "liquor" as defined in section 102 of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code."Applicant."(1) Any of the following:(i) A recovery support provider.(ii) A person that provides support and technical assistance to a recovery support provider.(2) The term does not include an individual or a for-profit entity."Commonwealth agency." An executive agency or independent agency as those terms are defined in 2 Pa.C.S. § 101 (relating to definitions)."Conspicuous location." A location open to the public where an individual is likely to see and read the poster developed under section 52C12(a)(1) (relating to development of opioid overdose awareness materials). The term includes a bathroom, bulletin board, entrance, exit, hallway or lobby."Controlled substance." As defined in section 2 of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act.20250SB0516PN0479 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Department." The Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs of the Commonwealth."Metropolitan transportation authority." An authority operating under 74 Pa.C.S. Ch. 17 (relating to metropolitan transportation authorities)."Municipality." A county, city, borough, incorporated town or township."Opioid antagonist." A drug or device approved under 21 U.S.C. Ch. 9 (relating to Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act) for emergency reversal of known or suspected opioid overdose, including naloxone hydrochloride or other similarly acting drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the treatment of an opioid overdose."Peer recovery specialist." An individual with continuous personal recovery from a substance use disorder who has received substance use recovery-focused education and training in recovery support services."Program." The Lifetime Recovery from Substance Use Grant Program established under section 52C42 (relating to Lifetime Recovery from Substance Use Grant Program). "Recipient." An applicant that receives a grant under this chapter."Recovery from substance use ." The process of change through which an individual who had been engaging in substance use takes steps to improve the individual's health and wellness, leads a self-directed life and strives to reach the individual's own potential."Recovery support provider." Any of the following that provide recovery support services to individuals, families and communities in this Commonwealth:20250SB0516PN0479 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A nonprofit organization.(2) A hospital or other health care provider.(3) A municipality.(4) A single county authority created under the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.221, No.63), known as the Pennsylvania Drug and Alcohol Abuse Control Act.(5) A recovery house licensed under Subarticle (b) of Article XXIII-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929."Recovery support services." Any of the following services relating to an individual in recovery from substance use : (1) Providing a network of peer support provided by peer recovery specialists for an individual in recovery from substance use , including advocacy for individuals in recovery from substance use . (2) Providing and supporting a network of family support or community support for families and communities of those in recovery from substance use . (3) Providing crisis intervention referrals for individuals in recovery from substance use . (4) Assisting an individual in recovery from substance use in gaining stable living arrangements, including assisting the individual in identifying appropriate living arrangements and preparing necessary paperwork.(5) Assisting an individual in recovery from substance use in obtaining gainful employment, including providing a skill evaluation and assisting the individual in identifying employment opportunities.(6) Creating and maintaining the technical assistance needs of workplaces that provide support for employees in 20250SB0516PN0479 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 recovery from substance use . (7) Providing mentoring service to an individual in recovery from substance use . (8) Providing referrals, assistance or consultation for individuals in recovery from substance use in obtaining services under paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6) and (7)."Substance use ." The use or misuse of a controlled substance or alcohol.SUBCHAPTER BOPIOID OVERDOSE AWARENESSSec.52C11. Scope of subchapter.52C12. Development of opioid overdose awareness materials.§ 52C11. Scope of subchapter.This subchapter relates to opioid overdose awareness.§ 52C12. Development of opioid overdose awareness materials.(a) Opioid overdose awareness materials.--(1) The Department of Health, in collaboration with the department, shall:(i) Develop a poster that contains the following information:(A) The signs of an opioid-related overdose.(B) What to do in the event of an opioid-related overdose.(C) Where to find an opioid antagonist.(D) Where to find additional resources and information, which may include a quick-response or QR code or a website URL.(ii) Develop a pamphlet with information contained 20250SB0516PN0479 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 on the poster developed under subparagraph (i).(iii) Make the following available on the Department of Health's publicly accessible Internet website:(A) the poster developed under subparagraph (i); and(B) the pamphlet developed under subparagraph (ii).(iv) Make the poster developed under subparagraph (i) available on the Department of Health's publicly accessible Internet website in various sizes should an entity wish to download the poster in a size other than the one provided by the Department of Health.(v) Provide the poster developed under subparagraph (i) in additional languages upon request by an entity listed under subsection (b).(vi) Provide copies of the poster developed under subparagraph (i) to each entity listed under subsection (b) at no cost to the entity.(2) The Department of Health may satisfy the requirements for the poster under paragraph (1)(i) and the pamphlet under paragraph (1)(ii) by updating existing materials with information described in paragraph (1)(i).(b) Display.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), the following entities shall display the poster developed under subsection (a)(1)(i) in a conspicuous location at the entities' properties, where feasible, as determined by the entity in discussion with the Department of Health:(i) A Commonwealth agency.(ii) A metropolitan transportation authority.20250SB0516PN0479 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) A municipality.(2) An entity listed under paragraph (1) shall not be required to display the poster described in subsection (a)(1)(i) if the entity already displays a poster with the information described in subsection (a)(1)(i) and provides the Department of Health with notice of the use of the alternative poster.SUBCHAPTER CLIFETIME RECOVERY FROMSUBSTANCE USE GRANT PROGRAM Sec.52C41. Scope of subchapter.52C42. Lifetime Recovery from Substance Use Grant Program. 52C43. Application and review.52C44. Costs.52C45. Funding.52C46. Survey.52C47. Report.§ 52C41. Scope of subchapter.This subchapter relates to grants to support lifetime recovery from substance use and misuse. § 52C42. Lifetime Recovery from Substance Use Grant Program. (a) Establishment.--The Lifetime Recovery from Substance Use Grant Program is established within the department.(b) Purpose of program.--The program shall provide grants to assist in the development, expansion or improvement of recovery support services delivery in this Commonwealth.(c) Statewide and geographic balance.--The department shall award a portion of the amount available under this subchapter to applicants seeking grants on a Statewide basis and a portion of 20250SB0516PN0479 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the amount to each of the geographic areas of this Commonwealth designated under section 52C43(a)(2) (relating to application and review).§ 52C43. Application and review.(a) Guidelines.--No later than 45 days after the effective date of this section and at the discretion of the department thereafter, the department shall, after consulting with a representative cross section of this Commonwealth's recovery support providers, including individuals in recovery from substance use or family members of individuals in recovery from substance use, adopt guidelines for the administration of the grant program under this subchapter and shall make the guidelines available on the department's publicly accessible Internet website. The guidelines shall include the following:(1) The dates of the first and last day during which the department will accept applications.(2) A division of this Commonwealth into nine geographic areas. To the extent practicable, the geographic areas under this paragraph shall be comparable to geographic areas recognized by the department for similarly focused grants.(3) The standards by which an application will be scored. The following apply:(i) The standards adopted under this paragraph shall be designed to ensure that the grants awarded under this subchapter are used in the most effective manner across this Commonwealth.(ii) The standards adopted under this paragraph shall prioritize:(A) Applicants that are independent, nonprofit organizations led and governed by representatives of 20250SB0516PN0479 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 local communities of individuals in recovery from substance use . (B) Applicants proposing to serve areas or assist recovery support providers serving areas of this Commonwealth with a high incidence of substance use or that have demonstrated a need for additional substance use recovery support services. (4) Statistics to be used for determination of areas of this Commonwealth that have a high incidence of substance use . (b) Application.--An application for a grant under this subchapter shall be made on a form and in a manner required by the department.(c) Content of application.--An application for a grant under this subchapter shall include the following:(1) The name of the applicant.(2) Whether, if awarded a grant under this subchapter, the applicant would use the grant as follows:(i) on a Statewide basis; or(ii) within a geographic area under subsection (a)(2).(3) Subgrantees with which the applicant will contract to provide substance use recovery support services. (4) Recovery support providers to which the applicant intends to provide support and technical assistance.(5) Recovery support providers to which the applicant intends to subgrant amounts received from the grant.(6) A proposed budget of what eligible costs will be paid for with a grant.(d) Review of application.--Beginning after the last day 20250SB0516PN0479 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that the department accepts applications, the department shall review the applications in accordance with this section and the guidelines adopted under subsection (a).(e) Awarding of grants.--After review of the applications under subsection (d), the department shall award grants as follows:(1) For applicants seeking a grant under subsection (c)(2)(i), the department shall award grants to applicants whose applications received the highest scores among applicants seeking a grant on a Statewide basis.(2) For applicants seeking a grant under subsection (c)(2)(ii), the department shall award grants to applicants whose applications received the highest scores among applicants seeking a grant within each geographic area.(f) Denial of applicant information.--An applicant that is not awarded a grant under subsection (e) shall be provided with information documenting the overall score the applicant received, the score received for each of the standards under subsection (a)(3) and the overall scores of all applicants in the denied applicant's category under subsection (c)(2) . § 52C44. Costs.An amount awarded as a grant under this subchapter may be used for the following costs:(1) Costs associated with providing recovery support services to residents of this Commonwealth.(2) Costs associated with assisting recovery support providers with developing, expanding or improving recovery support services, including providing training and development of the tools and facilities necessary to provide recovery support services.20250SB0516PN0479 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Costs incurred by the recipient under section 52C46 (relating to survey).§ 52C45. Funding.(a) Appropriation.--The General Assembly may appropriate money to the department for the program.(b) Funding from Opioid Settlement Restricted Account.--(1) Money appropriated to the department from the Opioid Settlement Restricted Account may be used to make grants under this subchapter.(2) The department shall ensure that amounts under paragraph (1) used for the program comply with restrictions on the use of the money in the Opioid Settlement Restricted Account.(c) Funding from State Opioid Response Administration appropriation.--Federal money appropriated by the General Assembly for State Opioid Response Administration may be used for the purposes of this subchapter.§ 52C46. Survey.(a) Performance of survey.--No less frequently than once per year, a recipient shall perform a survey of individuals who received recovery support services from the recipient during the time period in which a recipient received a grant under this subchapter.(b) Contents of survey.--Results of the survey may not contain any personally identifiable information.(c) Voluntary participation.--Participation in the survey under this section by an individual who received recovery support services shall be voluntary.(d) Submission to department.--A recipient shall provide information received under subsection (a) to the department in a 20250SB0516PN0479 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 manner and form as requested by the department.§ 52C47. Report.(a) Annual report.--No later than March 31, 2025, and March 31 of each year thereafter, the department shall publish an annual report that includes the following:(1) The name and address of each recipient.(2) The amount awarded to each recipient for each fiscal year.(3) The number of individuals who received recovery support services from each recipient under paragraph (2) in each fiscal year in which the recipient received a grant under this subchapter.(4) A review of results of the surveys conducted under section 52C46 (relating to survey), including the percentage of individuals receiving services from the recipient who remain in long-term recovery after six months, one year, two years, five years and more than 10 years.(b) Prohibited content.--The report under this section may not contain any personally identifiable information of an individual who received recovery support from a recipient.(c) Submission of report.--The report under this section shall be submitted to the following:(1) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate.(4) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health Committee of the House of Representatives.20250SB0516PN0479 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Human Services Committee of the House of Representatives.(d) Public availability.--The report shall be made available to the public on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0516PN0479 - 13 - 123456